Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7883.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Sections 39-3-24 and 39-3-25 of the General Laws in Chapter 39-3 entitled
"Regulatory Powers of Administration" is hereby amended to read as follows:
39-3-24. Transactions between utilities for which approval required.
(a) With the consent and approval of the division, but not otherwise:
(1) Any two (2) or more public utilities doing business in the same municipality or locality
within this state, or any two (2) or more public utilities whose lines intersect or parallel each other
within this state, or furnish a like service or product within this state, may enter into contracts with
each other that will enable the public utilities to operate their lines or plants in connection with each
other.
(b) With the consent and approval of the commission, but not otherwise:
(2)(1) Any public utility may purchase or lease all or any part of the property, assets, plant,
and business of any other public utility or merge with any other public utility, and in connection
therewith may exercise and enjoy all of the rights, powers, easements, privileges, and franchises
theretofore exercised and enjoyed by any other public utility with respect to the property, assets,
plant, and business so purchased, leased, or merged.
(3)(2) Any public utility may merge with any other public utility or sell or lease all or any
part of its property, assets, plant, and business to any other public utility, provided that the merger
or a sale or lease of all or substantially all of its property, assets, plant, and business shall be

authorized by a vote of at least two-thirds (⅔) in interest of its stockholders at a meeting duly called
for the purpose. Any stockholder who shall not have voted in favor of the merger, sale, or lease,
either in person or by proxy, shall be entitled to the rights, and the corporation shall be subject to
the duties, obligations, and liabilities set forth in §§ 7-1.2-1201 and 7-1.2-1202 with respect to
dissenting stockholders and to corporations that sell, lease, or exchange their entire assets
respectively.
(4)(3) Any public utility may directly or indirectly purchase the stock of any other public
utility.
39-3-25. Proceedings for approval of transactions between utilities.
(a) The proceedings for obtaining the consent and approval of the division commission for
such authority shall be as follows: There shall be filed with the division commission a petition,
joint or otherwise, as the case may be, signed and verified by the president and secretary of the
respective companies clearly setting forth the object and purposes desired; stating whether or not it
is for the purchase, sale, lease, or making of contracts or for any other purpose in § 39-3-24
provided; and also the terms and conditions of the same. The division commission shall upon the
filing of the petition, if it deem a hearing necessary, fix a time and place for the hearing thereof. If,
after the hearing, or, in case no hearing is required, the division is satisfied that the prayer of the
(b) The petition should may not be granted; that unless the facilities for furnishing service
to the public will not thereby be diminished; and that the purchase, sale, or lease and the terms
thereof are consistent with the public interest, it shall make such order in the premises as it may
deem proper and the circumstances may require. The public interest includes, but is not limited to,
an interest in rates, competitive access to markets and elimination of all anti-competitive influence,
in proper administration and regulation of any utility functions, in environmental protection, in any
interest addressed in the petition, and in any other purpose of Rhode Island law or policy implicated
by the proposed transaction.
(c) The commission shall allow intervention and advocacy of any citizen, business or any
other group seeking to advocate on or for any such element of the public interest. It shall not deny
participation on the premise that private commercial interests cannot also be in the public interest
or that any public interest is otherwise represented by any public agency or any other party.
(d) Any commission order issued under this section is subject to appellate review under §
42-35-15.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC004912
========
LC004912 - Page 2 of 3